Utah statutes.
59-5-215.   Disposition of taxes collected -- Credit to General Fund.

All taxes imposed and collected under Section 59-5-202 shall be paid to the commission, promptly remitted to the state treasurer, and except those taxes otherwise allocated under Section 51-9-305, credited to the General Fund.

